North Carolina statutes. Chapter 108A. Social Services.
Part 3. State-County Special Assistance.

§ 108A-40.
Authorization of State-County Special Assistance Program. [Effective until contingency met — see note]

The Department is authorized to establish and supervise a State-County Special Assistance Program. This program is to be administered by county departments of social services under rules and regulations of the Social Services Commission.

History.

1981, c. 275, s. 1; 2010-31, s. 10.19A(c).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective until the meeting of a contingency described in the Editor’s note, below. For this section as effective upon the meeting of that contingency, see the following section, also numbered

G.S. 108A-40

. See Editor’s note.

Contingent Effective Date.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 9A.3A(d) made the amendment to this section by Session Laws
2021-180, s. 9A3A(a) contingent upon certain requirements being met.
For details on those contingencies, see the note under the following version of this section.

Tiered Rate Structure Pilot Program.

Session Laws
2013-360, s. 12D.2(a)-(e), provides: “(a) As used in this section, the term ‘group home’ means any facility that (i) is licensed under Chapter 122C of the General Statutes, (ii) meets the definition of a supervised living facility under
10A NCAC 27G.5601(c)(1) or
10A NCAC 27G.5601(c)(3), and (iii) serves adults whose primary diagnosis is mental illness or a developmental disability but may also have other diagnoses.

“(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly to create a State-County Special Assistance program that allows counties greater flexibility in serving individual needs within their communities and greater control over how county funds are used to support this program in light of the fact that counties are required to pay for fifty percent (50%) of the costs of this program. To that end, the General Assembly directs the Department of Health and Human Services to establish a pilot program in accordance with subsection (c) of this section.

“(c) The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Aging and Adult Services (Department), shall establish a pilot program to implement a tiered rate structure within the State-County Special Assistance program for individuals residing in group homes, in-home living arrangements, and assisted living residences as defined in

G.S. 131D-2.1

. The purposes of the pilot program are to (i) determine the best way to implement a block grant for this program statewide and (ii) test the feasibility and effectiveness of implementing a tiered rate structure to address program participants’ intensity of need, including medication management. The Department shall select a minimum of four and a maximum of six counties to participate in the pilot program, at least two of which shall be rural counties and at least two of which shall be urban counties. The pilot program shall (i) be implemented during the 2013-2014 fiscal year, (ii) operate for at least a 12-month period, and (iii) comply with any agreements in effect between the State of North Carolina and the United States government.

“(d) The Department shall implement the pilot program in collaboration with the local departments of social services in the counties selected for participation. As part of the pilot program, the selected counties shall receive a State General Fund allocation as a block grant to be equally matched with county general funds. The General Fund allocation provided to each county participating in the pilot program shall be calculated based upon the average annual Special Assistance expenditures for that county during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, adjusted for the amount of projected annual growth in the number of Special Assistance recipients in that county during the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium. These funds may be used to pay for room, board, and personal care services, including medication management, for individuals eligible to receive State-County Special Assistance, subject to the following limitations and requirements:

“(1) These funds shall not be used to cover any portion of the cost of providing services for which an individual receives Medicaid coverage.

“(2) The pilot program shall comply with all federal and State requirements governing the existing State-County Special Assistance program, except that Section 12D.3 does not apply to the pilot program.

“(3) The tiered rate structure shall be based upon intensity of need, and an individual’s placement within a tier shall be based upon an independent assessment of the individual’s need for room, board, and assistance with activities of daily living, including medication management.

“(e) By February 1, 2014, the Department shall submit a progress report on the implementation and operation of the pilot program, including any obstacles to implementation; and by February 1, 2015, the Department shall submit a final report on the results of the pilot program, along with any recommendations based on these results, to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services and the Fiscal Research Division. The report due by February 1, 2015, shall include information from all participating counties on at least all of the following:

“(1) The amount of the tiered rates implemented as part of the pilot program.

“(2) The cost methodology for determining these tiered rates.

“(3) The number of individuals participating in the pilot program while residing in a group home.

“(4) The number of individuals participating in the pilot program while residing in an in-home living arrangement.

“(5) The number of individuals participating in the pilot program while residing in an assisted living residence as defined by

G.S. 131D-2.1

, broken down by facility type.

“(6) A comparison of the number of recipients of State-County Special Assistance prior to and during the pilot program, broken down by county and living arrangement.

“(7) Any other information the Department deems relevant for determining the best way to implement a block grant statewide for the State-County Special Assistance program.”

§ 108A-40.
Authorization of State-County Special Assistance Program. [For contingent effective date, see note]

The Department is authorized to establish and supervise a State-County Special Assistance Program. County departments of social services shall administer this program under rules and regulations of the Social Services Commission.

History.

1981, c. 275, s. 1; 2010-31, s. 10.19A(c); 2021-180, s. 9A.3A(b).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective upon the meeting of a contingency described in the note, below. For this section as effective until the meeting of that contingency, see the preceding section, also numbered

G.S. 108A-40

. See note.

Contingent Effective Date.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 9A.3A(d) made the amendment to this section by Session Laws
2021-180, s. 9A.3A(a) contingent upon certain requirements being met. For details on those contingencies, see the note under this section.

State-County Special Assistance Program Changes.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 9A.3A(a), provides: “It is the intent of the General Assembly to provide greater parity among individuals receiving benefits under the State-County Special Assistance Program authorized under

G.S. 108A-40

regardless if they elect to reside in an adult care home, a special care unit, or an in-home living arrangement. To that end, no later than 30 days after the effective date of this subsection, the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Aging and Adult Services, shall apply to the federal Social Security Administration (SSA) for approval to allow eligible individuals residing in in-home living arrangements to qualify for State-County Special Assistance under the Social Security Optional State Supplement Program in the same manner as individuals residing in adult care homes or special care units. Additionally, no later than 30 days after the effective date of this subsection, the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Health Benefits, shall submit a State Plan amendment to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS) for approval to add Medicaid coverage for individuals residing in in-home living arrangements who qualify for State-County Special Assistance under the Social Security Optional State Supplement Program. It is the further intent of the General Assembly to appropriate sufficient funds in future fiscal years to support annual adjustment of the State-County Special Assistance Program payment rates using the federally approved Social Security cost-of-living adjustment. This subsection is effective when it becomes law.”

Tiered Rate Structure Pilot Program.

Session Laws
2013-360, s. 12D.2(a)-(e), provides: “(a) As used in this section, the term ‘group home’ means any facility that (i) is licensed under Chapter 122C of the General Statutes, (ii) meets the definition of a supervised living facility under
10A NCAC 27G.5601(c)(1) or
10A NCAC 27G.5601(c)(3), and (iii) serves adults whose primary diagnosis is mental illness or a developmental disability but may also have other diagnoses.

“(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly to create a State-County Special Assistance program that allows counties greater flexibility in serving individual needs within their communities and greater control over how county funds are used to support this program in light of the fact that counties are required to pay for fifty percent (50%) of the costs of this program. To that end, the General Assembly directs the Department of Health and Human Services to establish a pilot program in accordance with subsection (c) of this section.

“(c) The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Aging and Adult Services (Department), shall establish a pilot program to implement a tiered rate structure within the State-County Special Assistance program for individuals residing in group homes, in-home living arrangements, and assisted living residences as defined in

G.S. 131D-2.1

. The purposes of the pilot program are to (i) determine the best way to implement a block grant for this program statewide and (ii) test the feasibility and effectiveness of implementing a tiered rate structure to address program participants’ intensity of need, including medication management. The Department shall select a minimum of four and a maximum of six counties to participate in the pilot program, at least two of which shall be rural counties and at least two of which shall be urban counties. The pilot program shall (i) be implemented during the 2013-2014 fiscal year, (ii) operate for at least a 12-month period, and (iii) comply with any agreements in effect between the State of North Carolina and the United States government.

“(d) The Department shall implement the pilot program in collaboration with the local departments of social services in the counties selected for participation. As part of the pilot program, the selected counties shall receive a State General Fund allocation as a block grant to be equally matched with county general funds. The General Fund allocation provided to each county participating in the pilot program shall be calculated based upon the average annual Special Assistance expenditures for that county during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, adjusted for the amount of projected annual growth in the number of Special Assistance recipients in that county during the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium. These funds may be used to pay for room, board, and personal care services, including medication management, for individuals eligible to receive State-County Special Assistance, subject to the following limitations and requirements:

“(1) These funds shall not be used to cover any portion of the cost of providing services for which an individual receives Medicaid coverage.

“(2) The pilot program shall comply with all federal and State requirements governing the existing State-County Special Assistance program, except that Section 12D.3 does not apply to the pilot program.

“(3) The tiered rate structure shall be based upon intensity of need, and an individual’s placement within a tier shall be based upon an independent assessment of the individual’s need for room, board, and assistance with activities of daily living, including medication management.

“(e) By February 1, 2014, the Department shall submit a progress report on the implementation and operation of the pilot program, including any obstacles to implementation; and by February 1, 2015, the Department shall submit a final report on the results of the pilot program, along with any recommendations based on these results, to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services and the Fiscal Research Division. The report due by February 1, 2015, shall include information from all participating counties on at least all of the following:

“(1) The amount of the tiered rates implemented as part of the pilot program.

“(2) The cost methodology for determining these tiered rates.

“(3) The number of individuals participating in the pilot program while residing in a group home.

“(4) The number of individuals participating in the pilot program while residing in an in-home living arrangement.

“(5) The number of individuals participating in the pilot program while residing in an assisted living residence as defined by

G.S. 131D-2.1

, broken down by facility type.

“(6) A comparison of the number of recipients of State-County Special Assistance prior to and during the pilot program, broken down by county and living arrangement.

“(7) Any other information the Department deems relevant for determining the best way to implement a block grant statewide for the State-County Special Assistance program.”

§ 108A-41.
Eligibility. [Effective until contingency met — see note]

Assistance shall be granted under this Part to all persons in adult care homes for care found to be essential in accordance with the rules and regulations adopted by the Social Services Commission and prescribed by G.S. 108A-42(b). As used in this Part, the term “adult care home” includes a supervised living facility for adults with intellectual and developmental disabilities licensed under Article 2 of Chapter 122C of the General Statutes.

Assistance shall be granted to any person who meets all of the following criteria:

Meets one of the following:

Is 65 years of age or older.

Is between the ages of 18 and 65, and is permanently and totally disabled or is legally blind pursuant to

G.S. 111-11

.

(Effective until contingency met — see Editor’s note) Has insufficient income or other resources to provide a reasonable subsistence compatible with decency and health as determined by the rules and regulations of the Social Services Commission; and.

(2)

(For contingent effective date, see Editor’s note)

Has both (i) income at or below one hundred percent (100%) of the federal poverty level guidelines published by the United States Department of Health and Human Services and (ii) insufficient income or other resources to provide a reasonable subsistence compatible with decency and health as determined by the rules and regulations of the Social Services Commission.

Is one of the following:

A resident of North Carolina for at least 90 days immediately prior to receiving this assistance.

Repealed by Session Laws 2014-100, s. 12D.1(c), effective November 1, 2014.

A person discharged from a State facility who was a patient in the facility as a result of an interstate mental health compact that requires the State to continue treating the person within the State. As used in this sub-subdivision the term State facility is a facility listed under

G.S. 122C-181

.

When determining whether a person has insufficient resources to provide a reasonable subsistence compatible with decency and health, there shall be excluded from consideration the person’s primary place of residence and the land on which it is situated, and in addition there shall be excluded real property contiguous with the person’s primary place of residence in which the property tax value is less than twelve thousand dollars ($12,000).

The county shall also have the option of granting assistance to Certain Disabled persons as defined in the rules and regulations adopted by the Social Services Commission. Nothing in this Part should be interpreted so as to preclude any individual county from operating any program of financial assistance using only county funds.

History.

1949, s. 1038, s. 2; 1961, c. 186; 1969, c. 546, s. 1; 1973, c. 717, s. 1; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1252, s. 1; 1979, c. 702, s. 8; 1981, c. 275, s. 1; c. 849, s. 1; 1983, c. 14, s. 2; 1995, c. 535, s. 5; 1997-210, s. 1; 2001-209, s. 3; 2010-31, s. 10.19A(d); 2014-100, s. 12D.1(a)-(c).

Section Set out Twice.

The section above is effective until the meeting of a contingency described in the note under the following version of this section. For this section as effective upon the meeting of that contingency, see the following section, also numbered

G.S. 108A-41

. See note.

Contingent Effective Date.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 9A.3A(d) made the amendment to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 9A3A(a) contingent upon certain requirements being met.
For details on those contingencies, see the note under the following version of this section.

§ 108A-41.
Eligibility. [For contingent effective date, see note]

The Department shall grant assistance under this Part to all persons residing in adult care homes, special care units, and in-home living arrangements for care found to be essential in accordance with the rules and regulations adopted by the Social Services Commission and prescribed by G.S. 108A-42(b). As used in this Part, the term “adult care home” includes a supervised living facility for adults with intellectual and developmental disabilities licensed under Article 2 of Chapter 122C of the General Statutes.

The Department shall grant assistance to any person described in subsection (a) of this section who meets all of the following criteria:

Meets one of the following:

Is 65 years of age or older.

Is between the ages of 18 and 65, and is permanently and totally disabled or is legally blind pursuant to

G.S. 111-11

.

(1a)

Needs placement in an adult care home or special care unit and either resides in an adult care home or special care unit or would seek placement in an adult care home or special care unit if not for the State-County Special Assistance Program.

Has insufficient income or other resources to provide a reasonable subsistence compatible with decency and health as determined by the rules and regulations of the Social Services Commission. The following income limits are applicable for determining financial eligibility for State-County Special Assistance:

The total countable monthly income for individuals residing in adult care home facilities or in-home living arrangements without a diagnosis of Alzheimer’s disease or dementia shall not exceed the basic rate established in subsection (a) of

G.S. 108A-42.1

plus a personal needs allowance in an amount determined by the General Assembly.

The total countable monthly income for individuals residing in special care units or in-home living arrangements with a diagnosis of Alzheimer’s disease or dementia shall not exceed the enhanced rate established in subsection (b) of

G.S. 108A-42.1

plus a personal needs allowance in an amount determined by the General Assembly.

Is one of the following:

A resident of North Carolina for at least 90 days immediately prior to receiving this assistance.

Repealed by Session Laws 2014-100, s. 12D.1(c), effective November 1, 2014.

A person discharged from a State facility who was a patient in the facility as a result of an interstate mental health compact that requires the State to continue treating the person within the State. As used in this sub-subdivision the term State facility is a facility listed under

G.S. 122C-181

.

When determining whether a person has insufficient resources to provide a reasonable subsistence compatible with decency and health, there shall be excluded from consideration the person’s primary place of residence and the land on which it is situated, and in addition there shall be excluded real property contiguous with the person’s primary place of residence in which the property tax value is less than twelve thousand dollars ($12,000).

The county shall also have the option of granting assistance to Certain Disabled persons as defined in the rules and regulations adopted by the Social Services Commission. Nothing in this Part should be interpreted so as to preclude any individual county from operating any program of financial assistance using only county funds.

History.

1949, s. 1038, s. 2; 1961, c. 186; 1969, c. 546, s. 1; 1973, c. 717, s. 1; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1252, s. 1; 1979, c. 702, s. 8; 1981, c. 275, s. 1; c. 849, s. 1; 1983, c. 14, s. 2; 1995, c. 535, s. 5; 1997-210, s. 1; 2001-209, s. 3; 2010-31, s. 10.19A(d); 2014-100, s. 12D.1(a)-(c); 2021-180, s. 9A.3A(b).

Section Set out Twice.

The section above is effective upon the meeting of a contingency described in the note, below. For this section as effective until the meeting of that contingency, see the preceding section, also numbered

G.S. 108A-41

. See note.

Contingent Effective Date.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 9A.3A(d) made the amendment to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 9A.3A(a) contingent upon certain requirements being met. For details on those contingencies, see the note under this section.

§ 108A-42.
Determination of disability.

For purposes of G.S. 108A-41(b)(1), a person is permanently and totally disabled if:

This person was receiving aid to the disabled assistance in December 1973, and continues to be disabled under the definition of disability, having a physical or mental impairment which substantially precludes him from obtaining gainful employment and this impairment appears reasonably certain to continue without substantial improvement throughout his lifetime; or

This person applied for assistance on or after January 1, 1974, and is disabled under the Social Security standards.

For purposes of G.S. 108A-41(d), a “Certain Disabled” person is a person in a private living arrangement who is age 18 but less than age 65, having a physical or mental impairment which substantially precludes him from obtaining gainful employment, which impairment appears reasonably certain to continue without substantial improvement throughout his lifetime.

Disability shall be reviewed by medical consultants employed by the Department. The final decision on the disability shall be made by these medical consultants under rules and regulations adopted by the Social Services Commission.

History.

1979, c. 702, s. 9; 1981, c. 275, s. 1; 1983, c. 14, s. 1.

§ 108A-42.1.
State-County Special Assistance Program payment rates. [For contingent effective date, see note]

Basic Rate. — The maximum monthly rate for State-County Special Assistance recipients residing in adult care homes or in-home living arrangements without a diagnosis of Alzheimer’s disease or dementia shall be one thousand one hundred eighty-two dollars ($1,182) per month per resident. This rate shall be adjusted on January 1, 2024, and each January 1 thereafter, using the federally approved Social Security cost-of-living adjustment effective for the applicable year.

Enhanced Rate. — The maximum monthly rate for State-County Special Assistance recipients residing in special care units or in-home living arrangements with a diagnosis of Alzheimer’s disease or dementia shall be one thousand five hundred fifteen dollars ($1,515) per month per resident. This rate shall be adjusted on January 1, 2024, and each January 1 thereafter, using the federally approved Social Security cost-of-living adjustment effective for the applicable year.

History.

2021-180, s. 9A.3A(b).

Contingent Effective Date Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 9A.3A(d) made the addition of this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 9A.3A(b) contingent upon certain requirements being met. For details on those contingencies, see the note under this section.

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 9A.3A(d), provides: “Subsections (b), (c), and (e) of this section become effective on July 1, 2022, or 30 days after the date that all of the following have occurred, whichever is later:

“(1) Both the SSA and CMS have approved the applications submitted by the Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.

“(2) CMS has approved the use of savings arising from the enhanced federal medical assistance percentage (FMAP) for home and community-based services available to the State under section 9817(a) of the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 (ARPA), P.L. 117-2, for both of the expenditures identified in subsection (e) of this section.

“The Secretary of the Department of Health and Human Services shall report to the Revisor of Statutes when both the SSA and CMS approvals are obtained and the date of the approval. Subsections (b), (c), and (e) of this section shall not become effective if either the SSA or CMS disapproves the applications submitted by the Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to subsection (a) of this section or if CMS disapproves the use of the savings arising from the enhanced FMAP for home and community-based services under ARPA for either of the expenditures identified in subsection (e) of this section. If, by June 30, 2023, the Department of Health and Human Services has not received (i) notification of application approval from both the SSA and CMS pursuant to subsection (a) of this section and (ii) notification from CMS of approval for the use of the savings from the enhanced FMAP for either of the expenditures identified in subsection (e) of this section, then subsections (b), (c), and (e) of this section shall expire. This subsection is effective when it becomes law.” Subsection (d) became effective November 18, 2021. As of March 24, 2022, the Revisor of Statutes had not received a report.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.”

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 43.7, is a severability clause.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 9A.3A (b), in subsection the first sentence of (a), substituted “The Department shall grant assistance” for “Assistance shall be granted”, inserted “residing”, and inserted “, special care units, and in-home living arrangements”; and rewrote subsection (b). For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 108A-43.
Application procedure.

Applications under this Part shall be made to the county director of social services who, with the approval of the county board of social services and in conformity with the rules and regulations of the Social Services Commission, shall determine whether assistance shall be granted and the amount of such assistance; but the county board of social services may delegate to the county director the authority to approve or reject all applications for assistance under this Part, in which event the county director shall not be required to report his actions to the board.

The amount of assistance which any eligible person may receive shall be determined with regard to the resources and necessary expenditures of the applicant, in accordance with the appropriate rules and regulations of the Social Services Commission.

History.

1949, c. 1038, s. 2; 1961, c. 186; 1969, c. 546, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 138; c. 717, s. 4; 1981, c. 275, s. 1.

§ 108A-44.
State funds to counties.

Appropriations made under this Part by the General Assembly to the Department, together with grants of the federal government (when such grants are made available to the State) shall be used exclusively for assistance to needy persons eligible under this Part.

Allotments shall be made annually by the Department to the counties participating in the program established by this Part.

No allotment shall be used, either directly or indirectly, to replace county appropriations or expenditures.

History.

1949, c. 1038, s. 2; 1955, c. 310, s. 3; 1961, c. 186; 1969, c. 546, s. 1; 1973, c. 717, s. 5; 1975, c. 92, s. 2; 1981, c. 275, s. 1.

§ 108A-45.
Participation.

The State-County Special Assistance Program established by this Part shall be administered by all the county departments of social services under rules and regulations adopted by the Social Services Commission and under the supervision of the Department. Provided that, assistance for certain disabled persons shall be provided solely at the option of the county.

History.

1949, c. 1038, s. 2; 1969, c. 546, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 138; c. 717, s. 6; 1975, c. 92, s. 3; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1252, s. 2; 1981, c. 275, s. 1; 2010-31, s. 10.19A(e).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2010-31, s. 10.19A(e), effective July 1, 2010, deleted “for Adults” following “Special Assistance.”

§ 108A-46.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2003-284, s. 10.53(a), effective July 1, 2003.

Cross References.

For present similar provisions, see

G.S. 108A-46.1

.

§ 108A-46.1.
Transfer of assets for purposes of qualifying for State-county Special Assistance.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, Supplemental Security Income (SSI) policy applicable to transfer of assets and estate recovery, as prescribed by federal law, shall apply to applicants for State-county Special Assistance.

History.

2003-284, s. 10.53(b); 2010-31, s. 10.19A(f).

§ 108A-47.
Limitations on payments.

No payment of assistance under this Part shall be made for the care of any person in a licensed facility that is owned or operated in whole or in part by any of the following:

A member of the Social Services Commission, of any county board of social services, or of any board of county commissioners;

An official or employee of the Department, unless the official or employee has been appointed temporary manager of the facility pursuant to

G.S. 131E-237

, or of any county department of social services;

A spouse of a person designated in subdivisions (1) and (2).

History.

1979, c. 702, s. 10; 1981, c. 275, s. 1; 1995, c. 298, s. 1; c. 535, s. 6; 2010-31, s. 10.19A(g).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2010-31, s. 10.19A(g), effective July 1, 2010, substituted “for the care of any person in a licensed facility” for “for the care of any person in an adult care home” in the introductory paragraph.

§ 108A-47.1.
Special Assistance in-home payments. [For contingent repeal, see note]

The Department of Health and Human Services may use funds from the existing State-County Special Assistance budget to provide Special Assistance payments to eligible individuals 18 years of age or older in in-home living arrangements. The standard monthly payment to individuals enrolled in the Special Assistance in-home program shall be one hundred percent (100%) of the monthly payment the individual would receive if the individual resided in an adult care home and qualified for Special Assistance, except if a lesser payment amount is appropriate for the individual as determined by the local case manager. The Department shall implement Special Assistance in-home eligibility policies and procedures to assure that in-home program participants are those individuals who need and, but for the in-home program, would seek placement in an adult care home facility. The Department’s policies and procedures shall include the use of a functional assessment.

All county departments of social services shall participate in the State-County Special Assistance in-home program by making Special Assistance in-home slots available to individuals who meet the eligibility requirements established by the Department pursuant to subsection (a) of this section. By February 15, 2013, the Department shall establish a formula to determine the need for additional State-County Special Assistance in-home slots for each county. Beginning July 1, 2014, and each July 1 thereafter, the Department shall review and revise the formula as necessary.

History.

2007-323, s. 10.14(a); 2010-31, s. 10.19A(h); 2012-142, s. 10.23(a); 2021-180, s. 9A.3.

Contingent Effective Date Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 9A.3A(d) made the repeal of this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 9A.3A contingent upon certain requirements being met. For details on those contingencies, see the note under this section.